Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1443
Continuance; when.

The court may grant a continuance for good cause shown by either party, but no subsequent continuance shall be granted except by agreement or unless extraordinary cause be shown to the court. For any subsequent continuance extending the initial trial date into the next periodic rental period, the court may require a tenant to deposit with the clerk of the court such rental payments as accrue during the pendency of the suit.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 43;

Laws 2021, LB320, § 9.